Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.92.710

Other laws superseded.

This chapter supersedes other state laws and local ordinances to the extent that those state laws or ordinances would otherwise restrict a jurisdiction's ability to comply with this chapter.

[ 2019 c 64 s 15; 2018 c 113 s 503.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2019 c 64: See note following RCW 1.20.110.